Massachusetts, session 194th, H874.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 50 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 138 and 139, the following words:-
“, except if by reason of a felony conviction”.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of chapter 51 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out, in lines 2 and 3, the following words:- “or incarcerated in a correctional
facility due to a felony conviction,”.
of 1